Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1258] Tobacco products and electronic
smoking devices; persons under twenty-one years of age. (1) It shall be
unlawful to sell or furnish a tobacco product in any shape or form or an
electronic smoking device to a person under twenty-one years of age.

(2) Signs using the statement, "The sale
of tobacco products or electronic smoking devices to persons under twenty-one
is prohibited", shall be posted on or near any vending machine in letters
at least one-half inch high and at or near the point of sale of any other
location where tobacco products or electronic smoking devices are sold in
letters at least one-half inch high.

(3) It shall be unlawful for a person under
twenty-one years of age to purchase any tobacco product or electronic smoking
device, as those terms are defined in subsection (5). This provision does not
apply if a person under the age of twenty-one, with parental authorization, is
participating in a controlled purchase as part of a law enforcement activity or
a study authorized by the department of health under the supervision of law
enforcement to determine the level of incidence of tobacco or electronic
smoking devices sales to persons under twenty-one years of age.

(4) Any person who violates subsection (1) or
(2), or both, shall be fined $500 for the first offense. Any subsequent
offenses shall subject the person to a fine not less than $500 nor more than
$2,000. Any person under twenty-one years of age who violates subsection (3)
shall be fined $10 for the first offense. Any subsequent offense shall subject
the violator to a fine of $50, no part of which shall be suspended, or the
person shall be required to perform not less than forty-eight hours nor more
than seventy-two hours of community service during hours when the person is not
employed and is not attending school.

(5) For the purposes of this section:

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to aerosolize and deliver nicotine or other
substances to the person inhaling from the device, including but not limited to
an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, or electronic
pipe, and any cartridge or other component of the device or related product.

"Tobacco product" means any product
made or derived from tobacco that contains nicotine or other substances and is
intended for human consumption or is likely to be consumed, whether smoked,
heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, or ingested by other means.
"Tobacco product" includes but is not limited to a cigarette, cigar,
pipe tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, snus, or an electronic smoking device.
"Tobacco product" does not include drugs, devices, or combination
products approved for sale by the United States Food and Drug Administration,
as those terms are defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. [L
2016, c 231, §50]

COMMENTARY ON §712-1258

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, added this section to implement
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next